Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4106
Preferred providers, defined.

Preferred providers shall mean providers of health services who agree to furnish services in a manner reasonably expected to contain or lower costs by contracting with insurers and participants in insurance arrangements or an insurer or participant organized as a provider of health services providing such services under a preferred provider contract.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 6.